Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.120

Violations and penalties.

Any person who shall practice, or offer to practice, engineering or land surveying in this state without being registered in accordance with the provisions of the chapter, or any person presenting or attempting to use as his or her own the certificate of registration or the seal of another, or any person who shall give any false or forged evidence of any kind to the board or to any member thereof in obtaining a certificate of registration, or any person who shall falsely impersonate any other registrant, or any person who shall attempt to use the expired or revoked certificate of registration, or any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

It shall be the duty of all officers of the state or any political subdivision thereof, to enforce the provisions of this chapter. The attorney general shall act as legal adviser of the board, and render such legal assistance as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 483; 1986 c 102 s 4; 1947 c 283 s 15; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8306-32. Prior: 1935 c 167 s 14; RRS s 8306-14.]

NOTES:

Forgery: RCW 9A.60.020.